Utah statutes.
39-1-37.   Military duties.

Participation in public ceremonies and parades and other duties in the service of the state shall be deemed military duties of the National Guard, and when participated in by the National Guard, or any portion thereof, under instructions of the commander in chief, the expenses and pay incident to the service of the state shall be allowed by the proper auditing officers from the state appropriation for the support of the militia.

